tests/heb.lexd
PATTERNS
:VerbInfl(1) VerbRoot(1) :VerbInfl(2) VerbRoot(2) :VerbInfl(3) VerbRoot(3) :VerbInfl(4) VerbInfl(1):

LEXICON VerbInfl(4)
<v><impf><p1><sg>:אֶ :  ֹ :
<v><impf><p1><pl>:נִ :  ֹ :
<v><impf><p2><sg><m>:תִ  :  ֹ :
<v><impf><p2><sg><f>:תִ  :  ֹ  ִי
<v><impf><p2><pl><m>:תִ :  ֹ ו
<v><impf><p2><pl><f>:תִ  :  ֹ נָה
<v><impf><p3><sg><m>:יִ  :  ֹ :
<v><impf><p3><sg><f>:תִ  :  ֹ  :
<v><impf><p3><pl><m>:יִ  :  ֹ  ו
<v><impf><p3><pl><f>:תִ  :  ֹ  נָה
<v><perf><p1><sg>: ָ   ַ  תִי
<v><perf><p1><pl>: ָ   ַ  נו
<v><perf><p2><sg><m>: ָ   ַ  תָ
<v><perf><p2><sg><f>: ָ   ַ  ת
<v><perf><p2><pl><m>: ָ   ַ  תֶמ
<v><perf><p2><pl><f>: ָ   ַ  תֶנ
<v><perf><p3><sg><m>: ָ   ַ  :
<v><perf><p3><sg><f>: ָ   ַ  ָה
<v><perf><p3><pl><m>: ָ   ַ  ו
<v><perf><p3><pl><f>: ָ   ַ  ו


LEXICON VerbRoot(3)
א כ ל
א כ ף
א מ ר
א ס ף
א ס ר
א ר ך
א ש ר
ב ח ר
ב ל ע
ב ר ח
ג א ל
ג ד ל
ג ז ז
ג ז ר
ג נ ב
ג נ ח
ג ר ד
ד ח ס
ד ע ך
ה י ה
ה ל ך
ה פ ך
ה פ ר
ה ר ג
ה ר ס
ז כ ה
ז ר ח
ז ר ק
ח ב ר
ח ד ר
ח ל ב
ח ל ה
ח ל ם
ח נ ק
ח ס ם
ח פ ר
ח פ ש
ח ש ב
ח ש ף
ט ח ן
ט ע ם
ט ר ף
י ד ע
י כ ל
י צ א
י צ ר
י ר ד
י ר ק
י ש ב
י ש ן
כ ל ל
כ ת ב
ל ח ץ
ל ק ח
מ ד ד
מ ח א
מ כ ר
מ ס ר
מ צ א
מ ר ח
מ ש ך
נ ג ע
נ ז ף
נ צ ץ
נ ש א
נ ש ך
נ ת ן
ס ג ר
ס ד ק
ס ח ט
ס ל ח
ס פ ר
ס ר ח
ס ת ם
ע ב ד
ע ז ב
ע ז ר
ע כ ר
ע מ ד
ע צ ר
ע ש ה
ע ש ק
פ ג ע
פ נ ה
פ ר ם
פ ר ץ
פ ר ק
פ ש ט
פ ת ח
צ ב ט
צ ב ע
צ ח ק
צ ל ל
צ ע ק
ק ב ל
ק ב ר
ק פ ץ
ק צ ץ
ק ר א
ק ר ב
ק ר ה
ק ש ר
ר א ה
ר ז ה
ר כ ב
ר ע ד
ר צ ה
ר ק ד
ר ת ח
ש א ל
ש ב ר
ש ח ה
ש ט ף
ש ל ח
ש ל ל
ש מ ח
ש מ ע
ש נ א
ש ק ט
ש ק ל
ש ר ף
ש ר ץ
ש ת ה
ת ל ה
ת ס ס
ת פ ס
ת ק ף
